Maryland, session 2026, SB0911.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
SUBTITLE 15. WEATHER ENGINEERING.
5–1501.
IN THIS SUBTITLE, “WEATHER ENGINEERING ACTIVITY” MEANS AN ACTIVITY
THAT IS PROHIBITED UNDER § 5–1502 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
5–1502.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0911*

SENATE BILL 911
A PERSON MAY NOT INJECT, RELEASE, OR DISPERSE, BY ANY MEANS, A
CHEMICAL COMPOUND, SUBSTANCE, OR APPARATUS INTO THE ATMOSPHERE
WITHIN THE STATE FOR THE PURPOSE OF AFFECTING THE TEMPERATURE,
WEATHER, CLIMATE, OR INTENSITY OF THE SUNLIGHT.
5–1503.
(A) A PERSON WHO OBSERVES A WEATHER ENGINEERING ACTIVITY MAY
REPORT THE ACTIVITY TO THE DEPARTMENT ONLINE OR BY TELEPHONE, MAIL, OR
E–MAIL.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL MAKE AVAILABLE ON ITS WEBSITE AN E–MAIL
ADDRESS AND ONLINE FORM FOR THE REPORTING OF A WEATHER ENGINEERING
ACTIVITY.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE MARYLAND
DEPARTMENT OF EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT, SHALL:
(1) ESTABLISH A METHOD FOR EVALUATING REPORTS MADE UNDER
THIS SECTION; AND
(2) INVESTIGATE ANY REPORT THAT THE DEPARTMENT DEEMS IN
NEED OF FURTHER REVIEW.
5–1504.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A PERSON
WHO VIOLATES § 5–1502 OF THIS SUBTITLE IS GUILTY OF A FELONY AND ON
CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $100,000.
(B) AN AIRCRAFT OPERATOR OR CONTROLLER WHO PARTICIPATES IN A
WEATHER ENGINEERING ACTIVITY IS GUILTY OF A FELONY AND ON CONVICTION IS
SUBJECT TO A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $5,000 OR IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 5
YEARS OR BOTH.
(C) EACH VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE IS A SEPARATE OFFENSE.
(D) MONEY COLLECTED FROM FINES IMPOSED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL
BE DEPOSITED INTO THE BAY RESTORATION FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–1605.2
OF THIS ARTICLE.

SENATE BILL 911 3
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.